prince/dictionaries/hu.aff
SFX A   0    déért        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dévá         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déval        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déul         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    détól        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dét          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déról        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dért         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déra         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dénál        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dénak        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dén          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéért      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékévá       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéval      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéul       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékétól      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékét        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéról      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékért       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéra       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékénál      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékénak      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékén        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéiért     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéivá      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéival     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéiul      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéitól     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéit       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéiról     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéira      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéinál     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéinak     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéin       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéiig      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéihoz     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéig       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéiból     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéiban     [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéiba      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéi        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéhoz      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéból      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéban      [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékéba       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déké         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékul        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déktól       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékról       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékra        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékon        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déknál       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déknak       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékká        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékkal       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékig        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékhoz       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékból       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékban       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékba        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dékat        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dék          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déiért       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déivá        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déival       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déiul        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déitól       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déit         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déiról       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déira        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déinál       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déinak       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déin         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déiig        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déihoz       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déig         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déiból       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déiban       [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déiba        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déi          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déhoz        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déból        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déban        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    déba         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dé           [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dul          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dtól         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dról         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dra          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    don          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dnál         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dnak         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dként        [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dkor         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dig          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dhoz         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    ddá          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    ddal         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dból         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dban         [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dba          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    dat          [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    d            [áéiíóőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskáért      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskává       [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskával      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskául       [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskától      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskát        [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskáról      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskára       [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskánál      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskának      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskán        [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákért     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákul      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskáktól     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákról     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákra      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákon      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskáknál     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskáknak     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákká      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákkal     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákig      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákhoz     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákból     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákban     [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákba      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskákat      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskák        [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskáig       [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskához      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskából      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskában      [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cskába       [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX A   0    cska         [áéiíóöőuúüű-]

PFX h Y 9
PFX h   0    ezerötszáz   .
PFX h   0    ezernégyszáz .
PFX h   0    ezernyolcszáz .
PFX h   0    ezerkétszáz  .
PFX h   0    ezerkilencszáz .
PFX h   0    ezerhétszáz  .
PFX h   0    ezerháromszáz .
PFX h   0    ezerhatszáz  .
PFX h   0    ezeregyszáz  .

PFX b Y 9
PFX b   0    ötszáz       .
PFX b   0    száz         .
PFX b   0    négyszáz     .
PFX b   0    nyolcszáz    .
PFX b   0    kétszáz      .
PFX b   0    kilencszáz   .
PFX b   0    hétszáz      .
PFX b   0    háromszáz    .
PFX b   0    hatszáz      .

PFX a Y 9
PFX a   0    ötven        .
PFX a   0    tizen        .
PFX a   0    nyolcvan     .
PFX a   0    negyven      .
PFX a   0    kilencven    .
PFX a   0    huszon       .
PFX a   0    hetven       .
PFX a   0    hatvan       .
PFX a   0    harminc      .

PFX X Y 61
PFX X   0    újra         .
PFX X   0    újjá         .
PFX X   0    össze        .
PFX X   0    át           .
PFX X   0    által        .
PFX X   0    végig        .
PFX X   0    végbe        .
PFX X   0    vissza       .
PFX X   0    utána        .
PFX X   0    túl          .
PFX X   0    tovább       [^b]
PFX X   0    tova         .
PFX X   0    tele         .
PFX X   0    szét         .
PFX X   0    széjjel      .
PFX X   0    szerte       .
PFX X   0    szembe       .
PFX X   0    rá           .
PFX X   0    rajta        .
PFX X   0    oda          .
PFX X   0    neki         .
PFX X   0    mellé        .
PFX X   0    meg          .
PFX X   0    le           .
PFX X   0    külön        .
PFX X   0    közre        .
PFX X   0    közbe        .
PFX X   0    körül        .
PFX X   0    körbe        .
PFX X   0    kölcsön      .
PFX X   0    ki           .
PFX X   0    ketté        .
PFX X   0    keresztül    .
PFX X   0    jóvá         .
PFX X   0    ide          .
PFX X   0    hátra        .
PFX X   0    hozzá        .
PFX X   0    helyre       .
PFX X   0    haza         .
PFX X   0    fönn         ny
PFX X   0    fönn         [^n]
PFX X   0    fölül        .
PFX X   0    föl          .
PFX X   0    félre        .
PFX X   0    félbe        .
PFX X   0    fenn         ny
PFX X   0    fenn         [^n]
PFX X   0    felül        .
PFX X   0    fel          .
PFX X   0    előre        .
PFX X   0    elő          .
PFX X   0    ellen        .
PFX X   0    el           .
PFX X   0    egybe        .
PFX X   0    benn         ny
PFX X   0    benn         [^n]
PFX X   0    bele         .
PFX X   0    be           .
PFX X   0    alá          .
PFX X   0    agyon        .
PFX X   0    abba         .

PFX D Y 3
PFX D   0    legeslegesleg .
PFX D   0    legesleg     .
PFX D   0    leg          .

   1
